Washington statutes.
RCW 40.24.110

Disclosure of name, address, or vehicle or vessel information.

The department of licensing, county auditors, or agencies or firms authorized by the department of licensing may not disclose the name, any address, vehicle make, vehicle model, vehicle year, vehicle identification number, vessel make and model, vessel model year, hull identification number, vessel document number, vessel registration number, vessel decal number, or license plate number associated with a program participant under the disclosure authority provided in RCW 46.12.635 except as allowed in RCW 46.12.635(6) or if provided with a court order as allowed in RCW 40.24.075.

[ 2019 c 278 s 2.]